Hawaii statutes.
§196-6 Energy efficient storage hot water
heaters. (a) No new storage hot water heater which is not certified as
meeting the energy efficiency standards of the American Society of Heating,
Refrigerating and Air Conditioning Engineers, Inc., as set forth as the current
ASHRAE 90 Standard, shall be sold or installed in the State after June 1,
1985; provided, however, that nothing contained herein shall prevent sales from
being made in the State for use outside the State.

(b) Any violation of subsection (a) shall be a
misdemeanor; provided a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500 shall be
imposed, and all fines shall be imposed consecutively. Each storage hot water
heater sold in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.
[L 1984, c 124, §1; am L 2009, c 153, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next